Illinois, session 104th, HB1179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit for blood bank donations.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, each taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the taxes 10imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in the amount 11of $250, provided that (i) the taxpayer made at least 4 12donations of human whole blood or human blood components 13during the taxable year in which the credit is claimed and (ii) 14each donation was made to a blood bank, as defined in the 15Illinois Clinical Laboratory and Blood Bank Act, that 16qualified as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of 17the Internal Revenue Code during the taxable year in which the 18donation was made. 19    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 20the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 21the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 22may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 235 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax   HB1179- 2 -LRB104 06032 HLH 16065 b1credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 2a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 3that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 4shall be applied first. 5    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 6250. 7    (d) As used in this Section: 8    "Human blood components" means any one or more of the 9following derived from human whole blood: red blood cells, 10white blood cells, platelets, or plasma. 11    (e) The Department shall adopt any rules necessary to 12implement and administer this Section.  13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.